District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-702

Contracts for collection and disposal of garbage and refuse.

Repealed.

History

May 18, 1910, 36 Stat. 389, ch. 248
Mar. 3, 1915, 38 Stat. 904, ch. 80
Apr. 6, 1978, D.C. Law 2-69, § 4, 24 DCR 6800
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(b), 61 DCR 9971

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-502.
1973 Ed., § 6-502.

Editor's Notes

For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.